Oklahoma, session 2025, SB41.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1698.468 of Title 69, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
The bridge over the Kiamichi River on U.S. Highway 259
approximately one-half (1/2) mile south of the State Highway 63
intersection in Le Flore County shall be designated as the “PFC
Lewis Othel Branscum Memorial Bridge”. The Department of
Transportation shall cause suitable permanent markers bearing that
name to be placed on the bridge.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




ENGR. S. B. NO. 41 Page 1

Passed the Senate the 24th day of February, 2025.


Presiding Officer of the Senate

Passed the House of Representatives the ____ day of __________,
2025.


Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives















ENGR. S. B. NO. 41 Page 2